Utah statutes.
78B-15-401.   Maintenance of records.
(1)  The Office of Vital Records shall register the following records which
are filed with the office:
(a)  all declarations of paternity;
(b)  all judicial and administrative determinations of paternity; and
(c)  all notices of proceedings to establish paternity which are filed
pursuant to Sections 78B-6-110, 78B-6-120, 78B-6-121, and 78B-6-122.
(2)  A notice of initiation of paternity proceedings may not be accepted into
the registry unless accompanied by a copy of the pleading which has been filed
with the court to establish paternity.
(3)  A notice of initiation of paternity proceedings may not be filed if
another man is the adjudicated or declarant father.
